Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 1. The Department of Fish and Game.
Sec. 16.05.160.
Duty to arrest.

Each peace officer designated in AS

16.05.150

shall arrest a person violating a provision of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52, or any regulation adopted under this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52, in the peace officer’s presence or view, and shall take the person for examination or trial before an officer or court of competent jurisdiction unless in the judgment of the peace officer it would be in the state’s best interest to issue a warning or a citation under AS

16.05.165

.

History.

(§ 21 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Sec. 16.05.165.
Form and issuance of citation.

When a peace officer stops or contacts a person concerning a violation of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52 or of a regulation adopted under this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52 that is a misdemeanor, the peace officer may, in the officer’s discretion, issue a citation to the person as provided in AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

.

The supreme court shall specify by rule or order those misdemeanors that are appropriate for disposition without court appearance, and shall establish a schedule of bail amounts. Before establishing or amending the schedule of bail amounts required by this subsection, the supreme court shall appoint and consult with an advisory committee consisting of two law enforcement officers of the Department of Public Safety engaged in fish and wildlife protection, two representatives of the Department of Fish and Game, two district court judges, and the chairpersons of the House and Senate Judiciary Committees of the legislature. The maximum bail amount for an offense may not exceed the maximum fine specified by law for that offense. If the misdemeanor for which the citation is issued may be disposed of without court appearance, the issuing peace officer shall write on the citation the amount of bail applicable to the violation.

If a person cited for a misdemeanor for which a bail amount has been established under (b) of this section does not contest the citation, the person may, on or before the 30th day after the date of the citation, mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court in which the citation is filed by the peace officer

the amount of bail indicated on the citation for that offense; and

a copy of the citation indicating that the right to an appearance is waived, a plea of no contest is entered, and the bail is forfeited.

When bail has been forfeited under (c) of this section, a judgment of conviction shall be entered. Forfeiture of bail and all seized items is a complete satisfaction for the misdemeanor. The clerk of the court accepting the bail shall provide the offender with a receipt stating that fact if requested.

A person cited under this section is guilty of failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230

if the person fails to pay the bail amount established under (b) of this section or fails to appear in court as required.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, if a person cited for a misdemeanor for which a bail amount has been established under (b) of this section appears in court and is found guilty, the penalty that is imposed for the offense may not exceed the bail amount for that offense established under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 1995; am § 30 ch 40 SLA 2008; am §§ 32 — 34 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For fish and game bail forfeiture schedule, see Alaska R. of Admin. 43.2.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a), (c), and (e) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 16.05.170.
Power to execute warrant.

Each peace officer designated in AS

16.05.150

may execute a warrant or other process issued by an officer or court of competent jurisdiction for the enforcement of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52, and may, with a search warrant, search any place at any time.
The judge of a court having jurisdiction may, upon proper oath or affirmation showing probable cause, issue a warrant in all cases.

History.

(§ 21 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 7 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Sec. 16.05.180.
Power to search without warrant.

Each peace officer designated in AS

16.05.150

may without a warrant search any thing or place if the search is reasonable or is not protected from searches and seizures without warrant within the meaning of art. I, § 14, Alaska State Constitution, which specifically enumerates “persons, houses and other property, papers and effects.”
However, before a search without warrant is made a signed written statement by the person making the search shall be submitted to the person in control of the property or object to be searched, stating the reason the search is being conducted.
A written receipt shall be given by the person conducting the search for property which is taken as a result of the search.
The enumeration of specific things does not limit the meaning of words of a general nature.

History.

(§ 22 art I ch 94 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For possession and transportation, see 5 AAC 92, art. 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section is tailored carefully to art. I, § 14, of the Alaska Constitution and is therefore valid. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

Requiring a written signed statement of the reason for the search is objectionable but valid.
It is objectionable because it unnecessarily ties the hands of the field agents charged with enforcement of the fish and game laws, and is a provision which is quite uncommon, if not unique.
1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

There is no constitutional requirement that all searches be with warrant, and reasonable searches may be made without warrant. A reasonable search is one made (a) upon probable cause that fruits of a crime or evidence relating to the crime will be found; (b) under circumstances which would make the securing of a warrant impracticable. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 19.

A search may be made pursuant to a valid arrest, providing that the arrest is made prior to the search. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 19.

The statutory requirement that fish and game agents fill out a form stating the objects of search will not make an otherwise invalid search valid, but it may invalidate an otherwise valid search if not complied with. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

In the case of a vessel, the limits of the area open to search probably include the entire vessel. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 19.

Sec. 16.05.190.
Seizure and disposition of equipment.

Guns, traps, nets, fishing tackle, boats, aircraft, automobiles or other vehicles, sleds, and other paraphernalia used in or in aid of a violation of this chapter or a regulation of the department may be seized under a valid search, and all fish and game, or parts of fish and game, or nests or eggs of birds, taken, transported, or possessed contrary to the provisions of this chapter or a regulation of the department shall be seized by any peace officer designated in AS

16.05.150

.
Upon conviction of the offender or upon judgment of the court having jurisdiction that the item was taken, transported, or possessed in violation of this chapter or a regulation of the department, all fish and game, or parts of them are forfeited to the state and shall be disposed of as directed by the court.
If sold, the proceeds of the sale shall be transmitted to the proper state officer for deposit in the general fund.
Guns, traps, nets, fishing tackle, boats, aircraft, or other vehicles, sleds, and other paraphernalia seized under the provisions of this chapter or a regulation of the department, unless forfeited by order of the court, shall be returned, after completion of the case and payment of the fine, if any.

History.

(§ 23 art I ch 94 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.05.195.
Forfeiture of equipment.

Guns, traps, nets, fishing gear, vessels, aircraft, other motor vehicles, sleds, and other paraphernalia or gear used in or in aid of a violation of this title or AS 08.54, or regulation adopted under this title or AS 08.54, and all fish and game or parts of fish and game or nests or eggs of birds taken, transported, or possessed contrary to the provisions of this title or AS 08.54, or regulation adopted under this title or AS 08.54, may be forfeited to the state

upon conviction of the offender in a criminal proceeding of a violation of this title or AS 08.54 in a court of competent jurisdiction; or

upon judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction in a proceeding in rem that an item specified above was used in or in aid of a violation of this title or AS 08.54 or a regulation adopted under this title or AS 08.54.

Items specified in (a) of this section may be forfeited under this section regardless of whether they were seized before instituting the forfeiture action.

An action for forfeiture under this section may be joined with an alternative action for damages brought by the state to recover damages for the value of fish and game or parts of them or nests or eggs of birds taken, transported, or possessed contrary to the provisions of this title or a regulation adopted under it.

It is no defense that the person who had the item specified in (a) of this section in possession at the time of its use and seizure has not been convicted or acquitted in a criminal proceeding resulting from or arising out of its use.

Forfeiture may not be made of an item subsequently sold to an innocent purchaser in good faith. The burden of proof as to whether the purchaser purchased the item innocently and in good faith shall be on the purchaser.

An item forfeited under this section shall be disposed of at the discretion of the department. Before the department disposes of an aircraft it shall consider transfer of ownership of the aircraft to the Alaska Wing, Civil Air Patrol.

History.

(§ 3 ch 124 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1983; am § 5 ch 33 SLA 1996)

Sec. 16.05.200.
Power to administer oaths.

Each peace officer designated in AS

16.05.150

may administer to or take from any person, an oath, affirmation, or affidavit when it is for use in a prosecution or proceeding under or in the enforcement of this chapter.

History.

(§ 24 art I ch 94 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.05.210.
Ineligibility for bounties.

An employee or special hunter of the department may not receive or attempt to receive a bounty for the killing of a predator, or transfer the scalp or other part of a predator to another person for the purpose of collecting a bounty.

History.

(§ 16 art I ch 94 SLA 1959)